Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.010

Annual meeting.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually for the election of directors at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

(2)(a) If the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of a corporation registered as an investment company under the investment company act of 1940 so provide, the corporation is not required to hold an annual meeting of shareholders in any year in which the election of directors is not required by the investment company act of 1940.

(b) If a corporation is required under (a) of this subsection to hold an annual meeting of shareholders to elect directors, the meeting shall be held no later than one hundred twenty days after the occurrence of the event requiring the meeting.

(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section:

(a) Annual shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws; and

(b) If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

(4) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if the board of directors or another person is authorized in the bylaws to determine the place of annual meetings, the board of directors or such other person may, in the sole discretion of the board of directors or such other person, determine that an annual meeting will not involve a physical assembly of shareholders at a particular geographic location, but instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with RCW 23B.07.080.

(5) The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

(6) Shareholders may elect directors by written consent as permitted by RCW 23B.07.040 in lieu of holding an annual meeting.

[ 2020 c 57 s 47; 2018 c 55 s 1; 2002 c 297 s 20; 1994 c 256 s 28; 1989 c 165 s 60.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.